North Carolina, session 2025, HB1052.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of one million dollars ($1,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for
the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be allocated in the form of a directed grant to Forsyth County to be
used for the Cure Violence Program to address violence.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
*H1052-v-1*